Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Contributions for a Charitable Purpose Related to Disasters

273.470.
Entities organized for charitable purposes related to disasters — Requirement for filing financial reports when contributions exceed $25,000 — Filing requirements for other tax exempt organizations which solicited and received contributions exceeding $25,000 before June 15, 2013.

Any entity organized for charitable purposes under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, other than a religious organization that is recognized as tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that solicits and receives contributions exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a charitable purpose related to a disaster in Kentucky shall file quarterly financial reports with the Secretary of State until the funds are expended. The quarterly reports shall be in a form and format determined by the Secretary of State and shall contain at a minimum the following:

The amount of money received as a result of the solicitation at the time that the report is filed;

Where the funds collected as a result of the solicitation are spent; and

The amount of funds collected that are used for administrative costs.

The first quarterly report shall be filed no later than the last day of the third month following the commencement of solicitations.

Any entity organized for charitable purposes under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, other than a religious organization that is recognized as tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which solicited and received contributions exceeding twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for a charitable purpose related to a disaster in Kentucky between January 1, 2012, and June 25, 2013, shall file a financial report with the Secretary of State. The financial report shall be in a form and format determined by the Secretary of State and shall contain at a minimum the following:

The amount of money received as a result of the solicitation;

Where the funds collected as a result of the solicitation were spent; and

The amount of the funds collected that was used for administrative costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 113, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.